lexc-files/inflections/verb/verb-infl_semiFinalE.txt
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Sg]:^la^ten             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Pl]:^li^si              Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Du]:^li^stek             Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Sg]:^la^ken             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Pl]:^la^msi             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Du]:^la^mtek             Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Sg]:^la^ken             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Pl]:^la^msi             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Du]:^la^mtek             Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Sg]:^la^ken             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Pl]:^la^msi             Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Du]:^la^mtek             Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[2--.2--] forms                                                                                                                                                     |
!------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! negative present optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Intr]:^%{.m.%}fqaa  IntrOptNEG;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns]:^%{.m.%}fqaa  TrnsOptNEG;

!---------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Pl]:^%{.m.%}fqiita Enclitic;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Pl.3Pl]:^%{.m.%}fqiita Enclitic;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Du.3Pl]:^%{.m.%}fqiita Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! future optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Fut.Intr]:^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ghha  IntrOptFut;
^[Opt.Fut.Trns]:^nake                 TrnsOptFut;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! negative future optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Neg.Fut.Intr]:^yaquna  IntrOptFutNEG;
^[Opt.Neg.Fut.Trns]:^yaquna  TrnsOptFutNEG;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! participial-oblique 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[PtcpObl.Intr]:^yalghii IntrPtcpObl;
^[PtcpObl.Trns]:^yaqe    TrnsPtcpObl; 

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! precessive 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Prec.Intr]:^vagilga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Prec.Trns]:^vagilga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! concessive 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Conc.Intr]:^%{.m.%}ghnga  IntrConc;
^[Conc.Trns]:^%{.m.%}ghnga  TrnsConc;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! consequential I
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cnsq1.Intr]:^ya  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq1.Trns]:^ya  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! consequential II
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cnsq2.Intr]:^%{.sf.%}aqnga  IntrPrecCnsq;
^[Cnsq2.Trns]:^%{.sf.%}aqnga  TrnsPrecCnsq;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! conditional
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Cond.Intr]:^%{.sf.%}k  IntrCond;
^[Cond.Trns]:^%{.sf.%}k  TrnsCond;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! contemporative 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ctmp.Intr]:^%{.m.%}negh  IntrCtmp;
^[Ctmp.Trns]:^%{.m.%}negh  TrnsCtmp; 
^[Ctmp.Intr]:^%{.m.%}ngh   IntrCtmp; ! sometimes -e is absent, idk why
^[Ctmp.Trns]:^%{.m.%}ngh   TrnsCtmp; ! e.g. amsanaanghani ^['Sivuqam Kiyaghtaallgha Ayumiq' from Lore Vol1]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! subordinative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Sbrd.Intr]:^lu  IntrSubr;
^[Sbrd.Trns]:^lu  TrnsSubr; 
^[Sbrd.Intr]:^llu  IntrSubr; ! sometimes -l is devoiced, idk why
^[Sbrd.Trns]:^llu  TrnsSubr; ! e.g. kayusiisqellunga ^[Jacobson (2001) p.101]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! volitive of fear
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Volitive.Of.Fear]:^nayuka VolitiveOfFear;
